South Dakota, session 2026, SB35.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 33A-2-8 be AMENDED:
33A-2-8. A veteran may record, with a county register of deeds, any certificate of
discharge from service in the armed forces of the United States or the National Guard,
without charge.
The county register of deeds shall provide a certified copy of the veteran’s
certificate of discharge, without charge, upon request from:
(1) The veteran;
(2) A representative of the Department of Veterans Affairs;
(3) An individual designated by the veteran to have access to the certificate;
(4) The veteran's legal representative;
(5) A veterans' service officer that is:
(a) Employed by a county in this state, pursuant to § 33A-1-22; or
(b) Appointed by an Indian tribe, pursuant to § 33A-1-29;
(6) A veterans service organization representative, accredited by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs; or
(7) The veteran's next of kin, if the veteran is deceased.
This section does not apply to a version of a veteran's certificate of discharge that
does not display the veteran's type of discharge.
An individual requesting a certified copy of a veteran's certificate of discharge shall
submit to the register of deeds a form, provided by the Department of Veterans Affairs,
that discloses the individual's eligibility to be issued the certified copy pursuant to this
section.

26.407.10 2 35
An Act to revise the process for requesting a veteran's certificate of discharge from a county
register of deeds.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 35
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 35 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB35 ENROLLED